District of Columbia statutes.
15-306

Election to move for new judgment in lieu of execution.

During the life of the original judgment the plaintiff, instead of issuing execution thereon within the time allowed therefor, may elect to obtain a new judgment by motion and hearing as provided by rules of court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-306.
1973 Ed., § 15-306.